District of Columbia statutes.
34-404

Number of directors of public utilities.

The Board of Directors of every public utility shall consist of not more than 17 nor less than 7 members, within which limitation the membership may be in any case increased or diminished, as the stockholders or the Board of Directors may from time to time determine.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 996, ch. 150, § 8, par. 100
July 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-146, § 2, 43 DCR 2845
1981 Ed., § 43-104.
1973 Ed., § 40-1004.